Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-1204
Department, defined.

Department shall mean the Division of Disability and Aging of the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 971;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 807;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 35.
July 18, 2026